Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 1. General Provisions
An “all-surface vehicle” or “ASV” means any non-highway recreational vehicle, except a snowmobile, when used for cross-country travel on trails or on any one of the following or combination of the following: land, water, snow, ice, marsh, swampland, and natural terrain. An all-surface vehicle shall be designed for use both on land and in water, with or without tracks, shall be capable of flotation and shall be equipped with a skid-steering system, a sealed body, a fully contained cooling system, and six or eight tires designed to be inflated with an operating pressure not exceeding 10 pounds per square inch as recommended by the manufacturer. An all-surface vehicle shall have a net weight of 1,500 pounds or less, shall have a width of 75 inches or less, shall be equipped with an engine of not more than 50 horsepower, and shall have a maximum speed of not more than 25 miles per hour. An ASV when operated in water shall be considered to be a motorboat and shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 29, subchapter 2 of this title. An ASV operated anywhere except in water shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 31 of this title.

“Vulnerable user” means a pedestrian; an operator of highway building, repair, or maintenance equipment or of agricultural equipment; a person operating a wheelchair or other personal mobility device, whether motorized or not; a person operating a bicycle or other nonmotorized means of transportation (such as roller skates, rollerblades, or roller skis); a person operating a motor-assisted bicycle or an electric bicycle; or a person riding, driving, or herding an animal.

“Portable electronic device” means a portable electronic or computing device, including a cellular telephone, personal digital assistant (PDA), or laptop computer. “Portable electronic device” does not include a two-way or Citizens Band radio, or equipment used by a licensed Amateur Radio operator in accordance with 47 C.F.R. Part 97.

“Business day” or “working day” means any calendar day except Saturday, Sunday, or any day classified as a holiday under

1 V.S.A. § 371

.

“Serious bodily injury” has the meaning set forth in

13 V.S.A. § 1021

.

“Plug-in electric vehicle” means a motor vehicle that can be powered by an electric motor drawing current from a rechargeable energy storage system, such as from storage batteries or other portable electrical energy storage devices, provided that the vehicle can draw recharge energy from a source off the vehicle such as electric vehicle supply equipment. A “plug-in electric vehicle” includes both a “battery electric vehicle” and a “plug-in hybrid electric vehicle” where:

“battery electric vehicle” means a motor vehicle that can only be powered by an electric motor drawing current from a rechargeable energy storage system; and

“plug-in hybrid electric vehicle” means a motor vehicle that can be powered by an electric motor drawing current from a rechargeable energy storage system but also has an onboard combustion engine.

“On-track equipment” means any car, locomotive, rolling stock, equipment, or other device that, alone or coupled, is operated on stationary rails.

“Class 2 electric bicycle” means an electric bicycle equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour.

(iii)

“Class 3 electric bicycle” means an electric bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 28 miles per hour.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 137

, § 1;

1963, No. 32

;

1963, No. 54

;

1963, No. 90

, § 1;

1963, No. 206

, § 1;

1963, No. 223

, § 2;

1964, No. 19

(Sp. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 9, 1964;

1965, No. 91

;

1965, No. 106

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 1966;

1965, No. 119

, eff. Sept. 1, 1965;

1965, No. 120

, § 2;

1965, No. 204

, § 1;

1966, No. 40

(Sp. Sess.), §§ 1-4, eff. March 11, 1966;

1967, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1967, No. 341

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1969, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 1, 1970;

1969, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 12;

1971, No. 14

, § 6, eff. March 11, 1971;

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 1, 1973;

1973, No. 25

, § 1, eff. March 15, 1973;

1975, No. 71

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1975;

1975, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 17, 1976;

1975, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1975, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1975, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.);

1975, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1977, No. 20

, §§ 1, 8;

1977, No. 102

, §§ 2, 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1977;

1977, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 5, 1978;

1977, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 6, eff. April 19, 1978;

1979, No. 19

, eff. April 6, 1979;

1979, No. 46

, §§ 6, 7, eff. April 26, 1979;

1979, No. 125

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 3, eff. April 15, 1980;

1979, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, eff. April 18, 1980;

1983, No. 6

, eff. Feb. 23, 1983;

1983, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1983, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 4, 5;

1983, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.);

1983, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 12

, § 1;

1985, No. 85

, § 1;

1985, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.);

1985, No. 12

4 (Adj. Sess.), §§ 7, 9, eff. April 18, 1986;

1985, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1987, No. 11

;

1987, No. 18

;

1987, No. 62

, § 2;

1987, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 13, 1988;

1987, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1987, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1989, No. 51

, § 7;

1989, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 15, 1990;

1989, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 14, 1990;

1989, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 72

, § 1;

1991, No. 88

, § 1; 1991,

1991, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.);

1991, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1993, No. 18

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994;

1993, No. 64

, §§ 1, 2;

1993, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, 4;

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 32

, § 1;

1997, No. 50

, § 44, eff. June 26, 1997;

1997, No. 55

, § 1, eff. June 26, 1997;

1999, No. 18

, § 41i, eff. May 13, 1999;

1999, No. 31

, § 1, eff. May 19, 1999; § 2, eff. July 1, 1999;

1999, No. 34

, § 6;

1999, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 1a, 2;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 49, eff. May 24, 2000;

2001, No. 38

, § 2;

2001, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1-4;

2001, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 8

, § 1;

2003, No. 56

, § 69, eff. June 4, 2003;

2003, No. 66

, § 217b;

2003, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2005, No. 29

, § 1;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

2005, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 20

, §§ 1, 2;

2007, No. 61

, § 1;

2007, No. 75

, § 32;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 37;

2007, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 49;

2007, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

2007, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 1, 2010;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 19a, eff. Sept. 1, 2010;

2011, No. 17

, § 2, eff. May 11, 2011;

2011, No. 17

, § 4, eff. July 1, 2013;

2013, No. 57

, §§ 1, 2, 3;

2013, No. 57

, § 25, eff. Jan. 1, 2014;

2013, No. 64

, § 7;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 141;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 12, 34;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 39, eff. Oct. 1, 2014;

2015, No. 47

, §§ 1, 2;

2015, No. 50

, § 1;

2015, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2015, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 37;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 54, 56;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 151;

2017, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2019, No. 59

, § 29, eff. June 14, 2019;

2019, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 130, 131, 132, 133;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 37;

2021, No. 20

, §§ 223, 224, 225, 226;

2021, No. 40

, §§ 1, 2, 3, 4, 5.